Wisconsin, session 2025, AB591.
do enact as follows:AB591,11Section 1. 20.235 (1) (fz) of the statutes is amended to read:AB591,2,7220.235 (1) (fz) Remission of fees and reimbursement for veterans and 3dependents. Biennially, the amounts in the schedule A sum sufficient to reimburse 4the Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System and technical college 5district boards under s. 39.50 for fee remissions made under ss. 36.27 (3n) (b) or (3p) 6(b) and 38.24 (7) (b) or (8) (b) and to reimburse veterans and dependents as provided 7in ss. 36.27 (3n) (bm) or (3p) (bm) and 38.24 (7) (bm) or (8) (bm).AB591,28Section 2. 36.27 (3n) (bm) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 36.27 (3n) (bm).AB591,39Section 3. 36.27 (3n) (bm) 2. of the statutes is repealed.AB591,410Section 4. 36.27 (3n) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB591,2,131136.27 (3n) (c) The higher educational aids board shall reimburse the board of 12regents for all academic fees and segregated fees remitted under par. (b) as provided 13in s. 39.50 (1) and (3m).AB591,514Section 5. 36.27 (3p) (bm) 2. of the statutes is repealed.AB591,615Section 6. 36.27 (3p) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB591,3,21636.27 (3p) (c) The higher educational aids board shall reimburse the board of 1regents for all nonresident tuition, academic fees, and segregated fees remitted 2under par. (b) as provided in s. 39.50 (1) and (3m).AB591,73Section 7. 38.24 (7) (bm) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 38.24 (7) (bm).AB591,84Section 8. 38.24 (7) (bm) 2. of the statutes is repealed.AB591,95Section 9. 38.24 (7) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB591,3,7638.24 (7) (c) The higher educational aids board shall reimburse the district 7board for all fees remitted under par. (b) as provided in s. 39.50 (2) and (3m).AB591,108Section 10. 38.24 (8) (bm) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 38.24 (8) (bm).AB591,119Section 11. 38.24 (8) (bm) 2. of the statutes is repealed.AB591,1210Section 12. 38.24 (8) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB591,3,121138.24 (8) (c) The higher educational aids board shall reimburse the district 12board for all fees remitted under par. (b) as provided in s. 39.50 (2) and (3m).AB591,1313Section 13. 39.50 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB591,4,21439.50 (1) University of Wisconsin System. At the end of each semester, the 15Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System shall certify to the board 16the number of students enrolled in the University of Wisconsin System to whom any 17fees or nonresident tuition has been remitted under s. 36.27 (3n) or (3p), the 18number of credits for which those fees or that nonresident tuition has been 19remitted, and the amount of fees and nonresident tuition remitted. Subject to sub. 20(3m), if If the board approves the information certified under this subsection, the 21board, from the appropriation account under s. 20.235 (1) (fz), shall reimburse the 22board of regents for the full amount of fees and nonresident tuition remitted. The 23board of regents shall credit any amounts received under this subsection to the 1appropriation under s. 20.285 (1) (k) and shall expend those amounts received for 2degree credit instruction.AB591,143Section 14. 39.50 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB591,4,11439.50 (2) Technical colleges. At the end of each semester, each technical 5college district board shall certify to the board the number of students enrolled in 6the technical college governed by the district board to whom any fees have been 7remitted under s. 38.24 (7) or (8), the number of credits for which those fees have 8been remitted, and the amount of those fees remitted. Subject to sub. (3m), if If the 9board approves the information certified under this subsection, the board, from the 10appropriation account under s. 20.235 (1) (fz), shall reimburse the district board for 11the full amount of fees remitted.AB591,1512Section 15. 39.50 (3m) of the statutes is repealed.AB591,1613Section 16. 39.50 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB591,5,61439.50 (4) Reimbursement of veterans and dependents; prorated 15reimbursement. In each fiscal year, the higher educational aids board shall 16determine the total amount of reimbursement due to students under ss. 36.27 (3n) 17(bm) 1. and (3p) (bm) 1. and 38.24 (7) (bm) 1. and (8) (bm) 1. If and, from the moneys 18appropriated under s. 20.235 (1) (fz) are not sufficient to provide full 19reimbursement to those students, the higher educational aids board shall prorate 20the reimbursement paid to those students under ss. 36.27 (3n) (bm) 1. and (3p) (bm) 211. and 38.24 (7) (bm) 1. and (8) (bm) 1. in the proportion that the moneys available 22bears to the total amount eligible for reimbursement under ss. 36.27 (3n) (bm) 1. 23and (3p) (bm) 1. and 38.24 (7) (bm) 1. and (8) (bm) 1. If the higher educational aids 24board prorates reimbursement under this subsection, the Board of Regents shall 1reimburse a student who is eligible for reimbursement under s. 36.27 (3n) (bm) 1. or 2(3p) (bm) 1., and the appropriate technical college district board, shall reimburse a 3student who is eligible for the reimbursement under s. 38.24 (7) (bm) 1. or (8) (bm) 41., in an amount that is equal to the difference between the amount of 5reimbursement for which the student is eligible and the amount of reimbursement 6paid by the higher educational aids board.AB591,177Section 17. Initial applicability.AB591,5,108(1) This act first applies to an eligible student enrolled in a Technical College 9System technical college or University of Wisconsin System institution in the fall 102026 semester.AB591,5,1111